src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_AHNEHTIA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 61 back t~d
!!€  ahnehtia: ahnehtia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # greed
0:ti  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:di  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_3SG_I  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:d  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:di  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dit  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dit  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_EHTIÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 61 front t~d
!!€  ehtiä: ehtiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:ti  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ti  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:di  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ti  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ti  VERB_FRONT_3SG_I  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:d  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ti  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ti  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:di  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:dit  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:dit  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ti  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_MÖNKIÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 61 front k~g
!!€  mönkiä: mönkiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # crawl
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:gi  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_3SG_I  ;
0:k  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:g  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:k  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:gi  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:git  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:git  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ONKIA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 61 back k~g
!!€  onkia: onkia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # fish
0:ki  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ki  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:gi  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ki  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ki  VERB_BACK_3SG_I  ;
0:k  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:g  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:k  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ki  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ki  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:gi  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:git  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:git  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ki  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_TYMPIÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 61 frontp~m
!!€  tympiä: tympiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # bore
0:pi  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:pi  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:mi  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pi  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pi  VERB_FRONT_3SG_I  ;
0:p  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:m  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:p  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pi  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:pi  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:mi  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:mit  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:mit  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pi  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KONTIA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 61 back t~n
!!€  kontia: kontia+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # mole
0:ti  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ni  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_3SG_I  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:n  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ni  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:nit  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:nit  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ti  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_HYLKIÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 61 back k~j
!!€  hylkiä: hylkiä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # reject
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ji  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_3SG_I  ;
0:k  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:j  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:k  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ji  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:jit  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:jit  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ki  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!! ### Verbs with long vowel stem
!!  These verbs also have da variant of a infinitive forms.

LEXICON VERB_KOPIOIDA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 62 back
!!€  kopioida: kopioida+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # copy
0:id  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:id  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_BACK_3SG_I  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_D  ;
0:i  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:i  VERB_BACK_DERIV_NTI  ;

LEXICON VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 62 front
!!€  öykkäröidä: öykkäröidä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # bully
0:id  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:id  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_3SG_I  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:i  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_NTI  ;

LEXICON VERB_SAADA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 63 a
!!€  saada: saada+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # get
0:ad  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ad  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_D  ;
0:a  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:a  VERB_BACK_DERIV_NTI  ;

LEXICON VERB_MYYDÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 63 y
!!€  myydä: myydä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # sell
0:yd  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:yd  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:y  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_NTI  ;

LEXICON VERB_JÄÄDÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 63 ä
!!€  jäädä: jäädä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # stay
0:äd  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:äd  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;
0:ä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:ä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_NTI  ;

!! ### Monosyllabic verbs with widening diphthong
!!  Widening diphthongs are simplified before past and conditional suffix i's
!!  by removal of first component. 

LEXICON VERB_VIEDÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 64 ie
!!€  viedä: viedä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # take
0:ied  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ied  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ie  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ie  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:i  VERB_FRONT_3SG_E  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:e  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ie  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ie  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ie  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:ie  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:ie  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_D  ;
0:ie  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:ie  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_NTI  ;

LEXICON VERB_TUODA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 64 uo
!!€  tuoda: tuoda+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # bring
0:uod  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:uod  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:uo  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:uo  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:uo  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:uo  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:uo  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_D  ;
0:uo  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:uo  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_D  ;
0:uo  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;
!0:uo  VERB_BACK_DERIV_NTI  ;
