src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
aikaansaada+V:aikaansa  VERB_SAADA  ;
ajelehtia+V:ajeleh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
allokoida+V:alloko  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
asioida+V:asio  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
damaskoida+V:damasko  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
denitrifioida+V:denitrifio  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
disaggregoida+V:disaggrego  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
edestuoda+V:edest  VERB_TUODA  ;
elehtiä+V:eleh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
empiä+V:em  VERB_TYMPIÄ  ;
entisöidä+V:entisö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
erodoida+V:erodo  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
esiintuoda+V:esiint  VERB_TUODA  ;
esillepyrkiä+V:esillepyr  VERB_HYLKIÄ  ;
esillesaada+V:esillesa  VERB_SAADA  ;
esilletuoda+V:esillet  VERB_TUODA  ;
esitelmöidä+V:esitelmö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
etiketöidä+V:etiketö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
fosforesoida+V:fosforeso  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
heittelehtiä+V:heitteleh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
henkevöidä+V:henkevö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
henkiä+V:hen  VERB_MÖNKIÄ  ;
hilsehtiä+V:hilseh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
hipelöidä+V:hipelö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
ratifioida+V:ratifio  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
huolehtia+V:huoleh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
hylkiä+V:hyl  VERB_HYLKIÄ  ;
hyppelehtiä+V:hyppeleh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
häiriköidä+V:häirikö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
hälinöidä+V:hälinö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
ilmehtiä+V:ilmeh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
ilmituoda+V:ilmit  VERB_TUODA  ;
ilvehtiä+V:ilveh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
impregnoida+V:impregno  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
intervenoida+V:interveno  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
julkituoda+V:julkit  VERB_TUODA  ;
juoda+V:j  VERB_TUODA  ;
juurehtia+V:juureh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
jälkeenjäädä+V:jälkeenjä  VERB_JÄÄDÄ  ;
jälleenmyydä+V:jälleenmy  VERB_MYYDÄ  ;
jälleentuoda+V:jälleent  VERB_TUODA  ;
jäntevöidä+V:jäntevö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
jäädä+V:jä  VERB_JÄÄDÄ  ;
kadehtia+V:kadeh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
kahlehtia+V:kahleh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
kammitsoida+V:kammitso  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
kapsehtia+V:kapseh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
kesannoida+V:kesanno  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
kiinnijäädä+V:kiinnijä  VERB_JÄÄDÄ  ;
kiintiöidä+V:kiintiö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
kiirehtiä+V:kiireh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
kitkeröidä+V:kitkerö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
koikkelehtia+V:koikkeleh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
konsertoida+V:konserto  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
kontia+V:kon  VERB_KONTIA  ;
kromioida+V:kromio  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
kyynelehtiä+V:kyyneleh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
kyytiä+V:kyy  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
käpsehtiä+V:käpseh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
kääntelehtiä+V:käänteleh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
kääpiöidä+V:kääpiö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
kömpiä+V:köm  VERB_TYMPIÄ  ;
köynnehtiä+V:köynneh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
lainehtia+V:laineh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
lehtiä+V:leh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
lempiä+V:lem  VERB_TYMPIÄ  ;
liekehtiä+V:liekeh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
lisensoida+V:lisenso  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
lontia+V:lon  VERB_KONTIA  ;
loppuunmyydä+V:loppuunmy  VERB_MYYDÄ  ;
lorvehtia+V:lorveh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
luoda+V:l  VERB_TUODA  ;
luutia+V:luu  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
läikehtiä+V:läikeh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
maahantuoda+V:maahant  VERB_TUODA  ;
meditoida+V:medito  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
mendelöidä+V:mendelö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
myydä% jälleen+V:jälleenmy  VERB_MYYDÄ  ;
myydä+V:my  VERB_MYYDÄ  ;
mätiä+V:mä  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
mönkiä+V:mön  VERB_MÖNKIÄ  ;
nikkelöidä+V:nikkelö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
nöpelöidä+V:nöpelö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
oirehtia+V:oireh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
onkia+V:on  VERB_ONKIA  ;
opponoida+V:oppono  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
poisviedä+V:poisv  VERB_VIEDÄ  ;
popularisoida+V:populariso  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
poutia+V:pou  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
punehtia+V:puneh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
pysäköidä+V:pysäkö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
reformoida+V:reformo  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
remehtiä+V:remeh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
rinnakkaispysäköidä+V:rinnakkaispysäkö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
routia+V:rou  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
rämpiä+V:räm  VERB_TYMPIÄ  ;
saada+V:sa  VERB_SAADA  ;
salamasotia+V:salamaso  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
sepelöidä+V:sepelö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
sertifioida+V:sertifio  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
siselöidä+V:siselö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
sontia+V:son  VERB_KONTIA  ;
suoda+V:s  VERB_TUODA  ;
sutia+V:su  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
suuntia+V:suun  VERB_KONTIA  ;
suvehtia+V:suveh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
säkenöidä+V:säkenö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
taituroida+V:taituro  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
talvehtia+V:talveh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
tervehtiä+V:terveh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
tinkiä+V:tin  VERB_MÖNKIÄ  ;
tonkia+V:ton  VERB_ONKIA  ;
tuikehtia+V:tuikeh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
tuoda+V:t  VERB_TUODA  ;
tuutia+V:tuu  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
tympiä+V:tym  VERB_TYMPIÄ  ;
typerehtiä+V:typereh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
vaatia+V:vaa  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
vandalisoida+V:vandaliso  VERB_KOPIOIDA  ;
vannehtia+V:vanneh  VERB_AHNEHTIA  ;
viedä+V:v  VERB_VIEDÄ  ;
viemäröidä+V:viemärö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
vyyhtiä+V:vyyh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
väkevöidä+V:väkevö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
välkehtiä+V:välkeh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
vääntelehtiä+V:väänteleh  VERB_EHTIÄ  ;
ympäröidä+V:ympärö  VERB_ÖYKKÄRÖIDÄ  ;
